Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1084
County implementation of next-generation 911 service.

Each county shall implement next-generation 911 service by July 1, 2026.

Laws 2006, LB 1222, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-440.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 66.